Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.217

Additional powers of a bank—Powers and authorities of savings bank—Definition—Restrictions.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in addition to all powers, express or implied, that a bank has under the laws of this state, a bank shall have the powers and authorities conferred upon a savings bank under Title 32 RCW.

(2) As used in this section, "powers and authorities" include without limitation powers and authorities in corporate governance and operational matters.

(3) The restrictions, limitations, and requirements applicable to specific powers and authorities of savings banks shall apply to banks exercising those powers and authorities permitted under this section but only insofar as the restrictions, limitations, and requirements relate to exercising the powers and authorities granted banks solely under this section.

[ 2013 c 76 s 5; 2010 c 88 s 13; 2003 c 24 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.04.217.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.